New York, session 2025-2026, A10572.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 168-a of the executive law, as 2 amended by chapter 542 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 3. The following days shall be days of commemoration in each year: 5 January sixth, to be known as "Haym Salomon Day", January twenty-sev- 6 enth, to be known as "Holocaust Remembrance Day", February fourth, to be 7 known as "Rosa Parks Day", February fifteenth, to be known as "Susan B. 8 Anthony Day", February sixteenth, to be known as "Lithuanian Independ- 9 ence Day", February twenty-eighth, to be known as "Gulf War Veterans' 10 Day", March fourth, to be known as "Pulaski Day", March eighth, to be 11 known as "International Women's Day", March tenth, to be known as 12 "Harriet Tubman Day", March twenty-ninth, to be known as "Vietnam Veter- 13 ans' Day", April ninth, to be known as "POW Recognition Day", April 14 twenty-seventh, to be known as "Coretta Scott King Day", April twenty- 15 eighth, to be known as "Workers' Memorial Day", the first Tuesday in May 16 to be known as "New York State Teacher Day", May ninth, to be known as 17 "Opioid Awareness Day", May seventeenth, to be known as "Thurgood Mars- 18 hall Day", the first Sunday in June, to be known as "Children's Day", 19 June second, to be known as "Italian Independence Day", June twelfth, to 20 be known as "Women Veterans Recognition Day", June nineteenth, to be 21 known as "Juneteenth Freedom Day", June twenty-fifth, to be known as 22 "Korean War Veterans' Day", the second Monday in July, to be known as 23 "Abolition Commemoration Day", August twenty-fourth, to be known as 24 "Ukrainian Independence Day", August twenty-sixth, to be known as 25 "Women's Equality Day", September eleventh, to be known as "Battle of 26 Plattsburgh Day" and also to be known as "September 11th Remembrance 27 Day", September thirteenth, to be known as "John Barry Day" and also to 28 be known as "Uncle Sam Day in the State of New York", September seven- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05328-01-5 A. 10572 2 1 teenth, to be known as "Friedrich Wilhelm von Steuben Memorial Day", the 2 third Friday in September to be known as "New York State POW/MIA Recog- 3 nition Day" except if such date of commemoration cannot be observed due 4 to a religious holiday, such observances shall then be conducted on the 5 second Friday of September, the last Saturday in September, to be known 6 as "War of 1812 Day", the fourth Saturday of September, known as 7 "Native-American Day", the last Sunday in September, to be known as 8 "Gold Star Mothers' Day", October fifth, to be known as "Raoul Wallen- 9 berg Day", October eleventh, to be known as "New Netherland Day in the 10 State of New York", October eighteenth, to be known as "Disabilities 11 History Day", October twenty-seventh, to be known as "Theodore Roosevelt 12 Day", November ninth, to be known as "Witness for Tolerance Day", Novem- 13 ber twelfth, to be known as "Elizabeth Cady Stanton Day", the third 14 Tuesday in November to be known as "New York State School-Related 15 Professionals Recognition Day", November twenty-sixth, to be known as 16 "Sojourner Truth Day", November thirtieth, to be known as "Shirley 17 Chisholm Day", December third, to be known as "International Day of 18 Persons with Disabilities", December seventh, to be known as "Pearl 19 Harbor Day", December sixteenth, to be known as "Bastogne Day" and that 20 day of the Asian lunar calendar designated as new year to be known as 21 "Asian New Year". 22 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.